New York, session 2025-2026, S8063.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision (b) of section 25-z of 2 the general city law, as amended by section 1 of part RR of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 No eligible business shall be authorized to receive a credit under any 5 local law enacted pursuant to this article until the premises with 6 respect to which it is claiming the credit meet the requirements in the 7 definition of eligible premises and until it has obtained a certif- 8 ication of eligibility from the mayor of such city or an agency desig- 9 nated by such mayor, and an annual certification from such mayor or an 10 agency designated by such mayor as to the number of eligible aggregate 11 employment shares maintained by such eligible business that may qualify 12 for obtaining a tax credit for the eligible [business'] business's taxa- 13 ble year. Any written documentation submitted to such mayor or such 14 agency or agencies in order to obtain any such certification shall be 15 deemed a written instrument for purposes of section 175.00 of the penal 16 law. Such local law may provide for application fees to be determined by 17 such mayor or such agency or agencies. No such certification of eligi- 18 bility shall be issued under any local law enacted pursuant to this EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13062-02-5 S. 8063--A 2 1 article to an eligible business on or after July first, two thousand 2 [twenty-five] twenty-eight unless: 3 § 2. The opening paragraph of subdivision (b) of section 25-ee of the 4 general city law, as amended by section 2 of part RR of chapter 56 of 5 the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 6 No eligible business or special eligible business shall be authorized 7 to receive a credit against tax under any local law enacted pursuant to 8 this article until the premises with respect to which it is claiming the 9 credit meet the requirements in the definition of eligible premises and 10 until it has obtained a certification of eligibility from the mayor of 11 such city or any agency designated by such mayor, and an annual certif- 12 ication from such mayor or an agency designated by such mayor as to the 13 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained by such eligi- 14 ble business or such special eligible business that may qualify for 15 obtaining a tax credit for the eligible [business'] business's taxable 16 year. No special eligible business shall be authorized to receive a 17 credit against tax under the provisions of this article unless the 18 number of relocated employee base shares calculated pursuant to subdivi- 19 sion (o) of section twenty-five-dd of this article is equal to or great- 20 er than the lesser of twenty-five percent of the number of New York city 21 base shares calculated pursuant to subdivision (p) of such section and 22 two hundred fifty employment shares. Any written documentation submitted 23 to such mayor or such agency or agencies in order to obtain any such 24 certification shall be deemed a written instrument for purposes of 25 section 175.00 of the penal law. Such local law may provide for applica- 26 tion fees to be determined by such mayor or such agency or agencies. No 27 certification of eligibility shall be issued under any local law enacted 28 pursuant to this article to an eligible business on or after July first, 29 two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-eight unless: 30 § 3. The general city law is amended by adding a new article 2-K to 31 read as follows: 32 ARTICLE 2-K 33 RELOCATION ASSISTANCE CREDIT PER EMPLOYEE 34 Section 25-ff. Definitions. 35 25-gg. Relocation assistance credit per employee. 36 § 25-ff. Definitions. When used in this article, the following terms 37 shall have the following meanings: 38 (a) "Aggregate employment shares" means the sum of all employment 39 shares maintained by an eligible business in a taxable year. 40 (b) "Eligible aggregate employment shares" means, in the case of an 41 eligible business, the amount, if any, of aggregate employment shares 42 maintained by an eligible business in eligible premises in the taxable 43 year in which such eligible business claims a credit pursuant to a local 44 law enacted in accordance with section twenty-five-gg of this article; 45 provided, however, that: 46 (1) such amount shall not exceed the lesser of: 47 (i) the number of aggregate employment shares maintained by such 48 eligible business in eligible premises in the taxable year during which 49 such eligible business relocates; 50 (ii) the maximum approved employment shares for such eligible busi- 51 ness; or 52 (iii) an amount equal to the product of multiplying the aggregate 53 employment shares and the linear scalar for such eligible business in 54 such tax year; and S. 8063--A 3 1 (2) a full-time work week or part-time work week at eligible premises 2 prior to the date of relocation shall not be taken into account in 3 determining eligible aggregate employment shares. 4 (c) "Eligible business" means any person subject to a tax imposed 5 under a local law enacted pursuant to part two or three of section one, 6 or section two of chapter seven hundred seventy-two of the laws of nine- 7 teen hundred sixty-six that: 8 (1) has been conducting substantial business operations at one or more 9 business locations outside of New York state for the twenty-four consec- 10 utive months immediately preceding the taxable year during which such 11 eligible business relocates but has not maintained employment shares at 12 premises in New York state at any time during the period beginning Janu- 13 ary first, two thousand twenty-five and ending on the date such business 14 enters into a lease or a contract to purchase the premises that will 15 qualify as eligible premises pursuant to this article; and 16 (2) on or after July first, two thousand twenty-five relocates all or 17 part of such business operations. 18 (d) "Eligible premises" means one or more non-residential premises 19 that consist of at least ten thousand square feet that are: 20 (1) wholly contained in real property located in a city with a popu- 21 lation of one million or more; and 22 (2) if contained in real property wholly located in the borough of 23 Manhattan, are premises for which final certificates of occupancy were 24 issued prior to January first, two thousand. 25 (e) "Employment share" means, for each employee, partner or sole 26 proprietor of an eligible business, the sum of: (1) the number of full- 27 time work weeks worked by such employee, partner or sole proprietor 28 during the eligible business's taxable year divided by the number of 29 weeks in the taxable year; and (2) the number of part-time work weeks 30 worked by such employee, partner or sole proprietor during the eligible 31 business's taxable year divided by an amount equal to twice the number 32 of weeks in the taxable year. Employment share shall not include full- 33 time or part-time work weeks attributable to employees, partners or sole 34 proprietors acquired by an eligible business as a result of a merger 35 with, acquisition of another person, or a transaction having a compara- 36 ble effect, that occurs after June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, 37 and before the end of the taxable year in which a credit is claimed by 38 such eligible business pursuant to a local law enacted in accordance 39 with section twenty-five-gg of this article, or to successors, if any, 40 to those employees, partners or sole proprietors. 41 (f) "Full-time work week" means a week during which at least thirty- 42 five hours of gainful work has been performed by an employee, partner or 43 sole proprietor. 44 (g) "Hotel services" means any services that consist predominately of 45 the lodging of guests at a building or a portion thereof that is regu- 46 larly used and kept open for such services. Hotel services shall include 47 the lodging of guests at an apartment hotel, a motel, boarding house or 48 club, whether or not meals are served. 49 (h) "Linear scalar" means, for an eligible business in a taxable year 50 in which a credit is claimed pursuant to a local law enacted in accord- 51 ance with section twenty-five-gg of this article, the quotient of divid- 52 ing the total square footage of an eligible premises by the product of 53 multiplying one hundred seventy-five by such business's aggregate 54 employment shares. 55 (i) "Maximum approved employment shares" means a limitation on the 56 aggregate employment shares that an eligible business may receive in any S. 8063--A 4 1 taxable year determined by the mayor pursuant to a local law enacted in 2 accordance with section twenty-five-gg of this article based on documen- 3 tation submitted by such business demonstrating such business's inten- 4 tion to relocate. The maximum approved employment shares is the number 5 of aggregate employment shares such business intends to relocate as 6 indicated by the mayor on the applicable initial certification of eligi- 7 bility. 8 (j) "Mayor" means the mayor of a city having a population of one 9 million or more, or an agency of such city as designated by such mayor. 10 (k) "Part-time work week" means a week during which at least fifteen 11 but less than thirty-five hours of gainful work has been performed by an 12 employee, partner or sole proprietor. 13 (l) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association, joint- 14 stock company, corporation, estate or trust, limited liability company, 15 and any combination of the foregoing. 16 (m) "Program total" means the sum of maximum approved aggregate 17 employment shares included in all initial certification of eligibility 18 issued by the mayor. 19 (n) "Relocate" means, with respect to an eligible business, to trans- 20 fer a pre-existing business operation to an eligible premises, or to 21 establish a new business operation at such premises, provided that an 22 eligible business shall not be deemed to have relocated unless at least 23 one employee, partner or sole proprietor of the eligible business is 24 transferred to such premises from a pre-existing business operation 25 conducted outside the state of New York. The date of relocation shall be 26 the first day on which the individual so transferred commences work at 27 such eligible premises. The taxable year of relocation shall be the 28 taxable year in which the date of relocation occurs. For purposes of 29 this article, an eligible business may relocate only once but may add or 30 substitute other eligible premises throughout such period. 31 (o) "Retail activity" means any activity which consists predominately 32 of: 33 (1) the sale, other than through the mail or by the telephone or by 34 means of the internet, of tangible personal property to a person, for 35 any purpose unrelated to the trade or business of such person; 36 (2) the selling of a service to an individual which generally involves 37 the physical, mental or spiritual care of such individual; 38 (3) the physical care of the personal property of any person unrelated 39 to the trade or business of such person; or 40 (4) the provision of a retail banking service. 41 § 25-gg. Relocation assistance credit per employee. (a) Any city 42 having a population of one million or more is hereby authorized and 43 empowered to adopt and amend a local law allowing an eligible business 44 that relocates to receive a credit against a tax imposed under a local 45 law enacted pursuant to part two or three of section one or section two 46 of chapter seven hundred seventy-two of the laws of nineteen hundred 47 sixty-six. The amount of such credit shall be determined by multiplying 48 five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate employment 49 shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year with respect 50 to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated, and may be 51 taken, pursuant to the provisions of section four-j of part two of 52 section one, or subdivision (l) of section one hundred one of section 53 two of chapter seven hundred seventy-two of the laws of nineteen hundred 54 sixty-six, for up to eleven consecutive taxable years beginning with the 55 taxable year in which the eligible business relocates, provided that no S. 8063--A 5 1 such credit shall be allowed for the relocation of any retail activity 2 or hotel services. 3 (b) No eligible business shall be authorized to receive a credit 4 against tax under any local law enacted pursuant to this article unless 5 the premises with respect to which it is claiming the credit are eligi- 6 ble premises and until it has obtained an initial certification of 7 eligibility from the mayor of such city and an annual certification from 8 such mayor as to the number of eligible aggregate employment shares 9 maintained by such eligible business that may qualify for obtaining a 10 tax credit for the eligible business's taxable year. Each initial 11 certification of eligibility shall include the maximum approved employ- 12 ment shares for the eligible business, which shall not exceed five 13 hundred employment shares. Any written documentation submitted to such 14 mayor in order to obtain any such certification shall be deemed a writ- 15 ten instrument for purposes of section 175.00 of the penal law. Such 16 local law may provide for an application fee for such certification to 17 be determined by such mayor. No initial certification of eligibility 18 shall be issued under any local law enacted pursuant to this article to 19 an eligible business on or after July first, two thousand twenty-eight 20 unless: 21 (1) prior to such date, such business has purchased, leased or entered 22 into a contract to purchase or lease eligible premises; 23 (2) prior to such date, such business submits a preliminary applica- 24 tion for an initial certification of eligibility to such mayor with 25 respect to a proposed relocation to such premises; 26 (3) such business enters into a lease or contract to purchase an 27 eligible premises between the date that such business submits such 28 preliminary application and three months thereafter; and 29 (4) such business relocates to such premises not later than thirty-six 30 months from the date of submission of such preliminary application. 31 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such mayor 32 shall not issue an initial certification of eligibility that would cause 33 the program total to exceed three thousand maximum approved employment 34 shares. Such mayor shall approve applications on a first-come, first- 35 serve basis among eligible businesses in accordance with rules promul- 36 gated pursuant to a local law authorized by subdivision (d) of this 37 section. Such mayor shall include on such mayor's website an indication 38 regarding whether the program total has reached three thousand maximum 39 approved employment shares. 40 (d) Such mayor shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations 41 to administer and ensure compliance with the provisions of this article, 42 including but not limited to rules and regulations to provide for alter- 43 native methods to measure employment shares in instances where an eligi- 44 ble business is not required by law to maintain weekly records of full- 45 time work weeks and part-time work weeks of employees, partners or sole 46 proprietors. 47 (e) For the duration of the benefit period, the recipient of a credit 48 pursuant to a local law enacted in accordance with this article shall 49 file an application for an annual certification each year demonstrating 50 such recipient's eligibility for such credit and the average wage and 51 benefits offered to the applicable relocated employees used in determin- 52 ing eligible aggregate employment shares. Such mayor shall have the 53 authority to require that statements filed under this subdivision be 54 filed electronically and that such statements be certified. S. 8063--A 6 1 § 4. Part II of section 1 of chapter 772 of the laws of 1966, relating 2 to enabling any city having a population of one million or more to raise 3 tax revenue, is amended by adding a new section 4-j to read as follows: 4 § 4-j. Relocation assistance credit per employee. (1) In addition to 5 any other credit allowed by this part other than a credit allowed by 6 section four-h of this part, a taxpayer that has obtained the certif- 7 ications in accordance with subdivision (b) of section twenty-five-gg of 8 the general city law shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 9 by this part. The amount of the credit shall be the amount determined 10 by multiplying five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate 11 employment shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year 12 with respect to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; 13 provided, however, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of 14 any retail activity or hotel services. For purposes of this section, the 15 terms "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", 16 "relocate", "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the mean- 17 ings ascribed by section twenty-five-ff of the general city law. 18 (2) The credit allowed under this section with respect to eligible 19 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 20 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 21 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years 22 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 23 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 24 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 25 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 26 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 27 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 28 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the eligible 29 business maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxa- 30 ble year of relocation and the denominator of which is the number of 31 days in such tenth taxable year during which such eligible aggregate 32 employment shares are maintained with respect to such premises. 33 (3) Except as provided in subdivision four of this section, if the 34 amount of the credit allowable under this section for any taxable year 35 exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried over, 36 in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to the 37 extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpayer's 38 tax for such years. 39 (4) The credits allowed under this section, against the tax imposed by 40 this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for the four 41 taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such relo- 42 cation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to be 43 credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 44 provisions of section seventy-seven of this title. For such taxable 45 years, such credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any 46 succeeding taxable year. 47 (5) The credit allowed under this section shall be deducted prior to 48 the deduction of any other credit allowed by this part, except as other- 49 wise provided by law. 50 § 5. Section 101 of section 2 of chapter 772 of the laws of 1966, 51 relating to enabling any city having a population of one million or more 52 to raise tax revenue, is amended by adding a new subdivision (l) to read 53 as follows: 54 (l) Relocation assistance credit per employee. (1) In addition to any 55 other credit allowed by this part other than a credit allowed by subdi- 56 vision (j) of this section, a taxpayer that has obtained the certif- S. 8063--A 7 1 ications in accordance with subdivision (b) of section twenty-five-gg of 2 the general city law shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 3 by this part. The amount of the credit shall be the amount determined by 4 multiplying five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate 5 employment shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year 6 with respect to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; 7 provided, however, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of 8 any retail activity or hotel services. For purposes of this subdivision, 9 the terms "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", 10 "relocate", "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the mean- 11 ings ascribed by section twenty-five-ff of the general city law. 12 (2) The credit allowed under this subdivision with respect to eligible 13 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 14 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 15 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years 16 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 17 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 18 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 19 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 20 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 21 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 22 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the eligible 23 business maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxa- 24 ble year of relocation and the denominator of which is the number of 25 days in such tenth succeeding taxable year during which such eligible 26 aggregate employment shares are maintained with respect to such prem- 27 ises. 28 (3) Except as provided in paragraph four of this subdivision, if the 29 amount of the credit allowable under this subdivision for any taxable 30 year exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried 31 over, in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to 32 the extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpay- 33 er's tax for such years. 34 (4) The credits allowed under this subdivision, against the tax 35 imposed by this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for 36 the four taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such 37 relocation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to 38 be credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 39 provisions of section seventy-seven of this title. For such taxable 40 years, such credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any 41 succeeding taxable year. 42 (5) The credit allowable under this subdivision shall be deducted 43 after the credits allowed by subdivision (b) of this section, but prior 44 to the deduction of any other credit allowed by this section. 45 § 6. Section 11-503 of the administrative code of the city of New York 46 is amended by adding a new subdivision (r) to read as follows: 47 (r) Relocation assistance credit per employee. (1) In addition to any 48 other credit allowed by this section other than a credit allowed by 49 subdivision (i) of this section, a taxpayer that has obtained the 50 certifications required by chapter six-E of title twenty-two of this 51 code shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter. 52 The amount of the credit shall be the amount determined by multiplying 53 five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate employment 54 shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year with respect 55 to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; provided, 56 however, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of any S. 8063--A 8 1 retail activity or hotel services. For purposes of this subdivision, the 2 terms "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", 3 "relocate", "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the mean- 4 ings ascribed by section 22-627 of this code. 5 (2) The credit allowed under this subdivision with respect to eligible 6 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 7 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 8 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years 9 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 10 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 11 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 12 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 13 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 14 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 15 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the taxpayer 16 maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxable year of 17 relocation and the denominator of which is the number of days in such 18 tenth succeeding taxable year during which such eligible aggregate 19 employment shares are maintained with respect to such premises. 20 (3) Except as provided in paragraph four of this subdivision, if the 21 amount of the credit allowable under this subdivision for any taxable 22 year exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried 23 over, in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to 24 the extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpay- 25 er's tax for such years. 26 (4) The credits allowed under this subdivision, against the tax 27 imposed by this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for 28 the four taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such 29 relocation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to 30 be credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 31 provisions of section 11-526 of this title. For such taxable years, such 32 credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any succeeding 33 taxable year. 34 (5) The credit allowable under this subdivision shall be deducted 35 after the credits allowed by subdivisions (b) and (j) of this section, 36 but prior to the deduction of any other credit allowed by this section. 37 § 7. Section 11-604 of the administrative code of the city of New York 38 is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 39 24. Relocation assistance credit per employee. (a) In addition to any 40 other credit allowed by this section other than a credit allowed by 41 subdivision seventeen of this section, a taxpayer that has obtained the 42 certifications required by chapter six-E of title twenty-two of this 43 code shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter. 44 The amount of the credit shall be the amount determined by multiplying 45 five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate employment 46 shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year with respect 47 to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; provided, 48 however, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of any 49 retail activity or hotel services. For purposes of this subdivision, the 50 terms "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", 51 "relocate", "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the mean- 52 ings ascribed by section 22-627 of this code. 53 (b) The credit allowed under this subdivision with respect to eligible 54 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 55 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 56 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years S. 8063--A 9 1 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 2 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 3 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 4 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 5 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 6 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 7 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the taxpayer 8 maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxable year of 9 relocation and the denominator of which is the number of days in such 10 tenth taxable year during which such eligible aggregate employment 11 shares are maintained with respect to such premises. 12 (c) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subdivision, if the 13 amount of the credit allowable under this subdivision for any taxable 14 year exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried 15 over, in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to 16 the extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpay- 17 er's tax for such years. 18 (d) The credits allowed under this subdivision, against the tax 19 imposed by this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for 20 the four taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such 21 relocation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to 22 be credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 23 provisions of section 11-677 of this chapter. For such taxable years, 24 such credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any succeed- 25 ing taxable year. 26 (e) The credit allowable under this subdivision shall be deducted 27 after the credit allowed by subdivision eighteen of this section, but 28 prior to the deduction of any other credit allowed by this section. 29 § 8. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended by 30 adding a new section 11-643.10 to read as follows: 31 § 11-643.10 Relocation assistance credit per employee. (a) In addition 32 to any other credit allowed by this part other than a credit allowed by 33 section 11-643.7 of this part, a taxpayer that has obtained the certif- 34 ications required by chapter six-E of title twenty-two of this code 35 shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this part. The 36 amount of the credit shall be the amount determined by multiplying five 37 thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate employment shares 38 maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year with respect to 39 eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; provided, howev- 40 er, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of any retail 41 activity or hotel services. For purposes of this section, the terms 42 "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", "relocate", 43 "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the meanings ascribed 44 by section 22-627 of this code. 45 (b) The credit allowed under this section with respect to eligible 46 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 47 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 48 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years 49 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 50 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 51 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 52 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 53 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 54 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 55 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the taxpayer 56 maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxable year of S. 8063--A 10 1 relocation and the denominator of which is the number of days in such 2 tenth succeeding taxable year during which such eligible aggregate 3 employment shares are maintained with respect to such premises. 4 (c) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of this section, if the 5 amount of the credit allowable under this section for any taxable year 6 exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried over, 7 in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to the 8 extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpayer's 9 tax for such years. 10 (d) The credits allowed under this section, against the tax imposed by 11 this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for the four 12 taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such relo- 13 cation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to be 14 credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 15 provisions of section 11-677 of this chapter. For such taxable years, 16 such credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any succeed- 17 ing taxable year. 18 (e) The credit allowable under this section shall be deducted after 19 the credit allowed by section 11-643.8 of this part, but prior to the 20 deduction of any other credit allowed by this part. 21 § 9. Section 11-654 of the administrative code of the city of New York 22 is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 23 24. Relocation assistance credit per employee. (a) In addition to any 24 other credit allowed by this section other than a credit allowed by 25 subdivision seventeen of this section, a taxpayer that has obtained the 26 certifications required by chapter six-E of title twenty-two of this 27 code shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this subchap- 28 ter. The amount of the credit shall be the amount determined by multi- 29 plying five thousand dollars by the number of eligible aggregate employ- 30 ment shares maintained by the taxpayer during the taxable year with 31 respect to eligible premises to which the taxpayer has relocated; 32 provided, however, that no credit shall be allowed for the relocation of 33 any retail activity or hotel services. For purposes of this subdivision, 34 the terms "eligible aggregate employment shares", "eligible premises", 35 "relocate", "retail activity" and "hotel services" shall have the mean- 36 ings ascribed by section 22-627 of this code. 37 (b) The credit allowed under this subdivision with respect to eligible 38 aggregate employment shares maintained with respect to eligible premises 39 to which the taxpayer has relocated shall be allowed for the taxable 40 year of the relocation and for any of the ten succeeding taxable years 41 during which eligible aggregate employment shares are maintained with 42 respect to eligible premises; provided that the credit allowed for the 43 tenth succeeding taxable year shall be calculated by multiplying the 44 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained with respect 45 to eligible premises in the tenth succeeding taxable year by the lesser 46 of one and a fraction the numerator of which is such number of days in 47 the taxable year of relocation less the number of days the taxpayer 48 maintained employment shares in eligible premises in the taxable year of 49 relocation and the denominator of which is the number of days in such 50 tenth taxable year during which such eligible aggregate employment 51 shares are maintained with respect to such premises. 52 (c) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subdivision, if the 53 amount of the credit allowable under this subdivision for any taxable 54 year exceeds the tax imposed for such year, the excess may be carried 55 over, in order, to the five immediately succeeding taxable years and, to S. 8063--A 11 1 the extent not previously deductible, may be deducted from the taxpay- 2 er's tax for such years. 3 (d) The credits allowed under this subdivision, against the tax 4 imposed by this chapter for the taxable year of the relocation and for 5 the four taxable years immediately succeeding the taxable year of such 6 relocation, shall be deemed to be overpayments of tax by the taxpayer to 7 be credited or refunded, without interest, in accordance with the 8 provisions of section 11-677 of this chapter. For such taxable years, 9 such credits or portions thereof may not be carried over to any succeed- 10 ing taxable year. 11 (e) The credit allowable under this subdivision shall be deducted 12 after the credit allowed by subdivision eighteen of this section, but 13 prior to the deduction of any other credit allowed by this section. 14 § 10. The opening paragraph of subdivision (b) of section 22-622 of 15 the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by section 3 16 of part RR of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 No eligible business shall be authorized to receive a credit against 19 tax or a reduction in base rent subject to tax under the provisions of 20 this chapter, and of title eleven of the code as described in subdivi- 21 sion (a) of this section, until the premises with respect to which it is 22 claiming the credit meet the requirements in the definition of eligible 23 premises and until it has obtained a certification of eligibility from 24 the mayor or an agency designated by the mayor, and an annual certif- 25 ication from the mayor or an agency designated by the mayor as to the 26 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained by such eligi- 27 ble business that may qualify for obtaining a tax credit for the eligi- 28 ble [business'] business's taxable year. Any written documentation 29 submitted to the mayor or such agency or agencies in order to obtain any 30 such certification shall be deemed a written instrument for purposes of 31 section 175.00 of the penal law. Application fees for such certif- 32 ications shall be determined by the mayor or such agency or agencies. No 33 certification of eligibility shall be issued to an eligible business on 34 or after July first, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-eight unless: 35 § 11. The opening paragraph of subdivision (b) of section 22-624 of 36 the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by section 5 37 of part RR of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 38 follows: 39 No eligible business or special eligible business shall be authorized 40 to receive a credit against tax under the provisions of this chapter, 41 and of title eleven of the code as described in subdivision (a) of this 42 section, until the premises with respect to which it is claiming the 43 credit meet the requirements in the definition of eligible premises and 44 until it has obtained a certification of eligibility from the mayor or 45 an agency designated by the mayor, and an annual certification from the 46 mayor or an agency designated by the mayor as to the number of eligible 47 aggregate employment shares maintained by such eligible business or 48 special eligible business that may qualify for obtaining a tax credit 49 for the eligible [business'] business's taxable year. No special eligi- 50 ble business shall be authorized to receive a credit against tax under 51 the provisions of this chapter and of title eleven of the code unless 52 the number of relocated employee base shares calculated pursuant to 53 subdivision (o) of section 22-623 of this chapter is equal to or greater 54 than the lesser of twenty-five percent of the number of New York city 55 base shares calculated pursuant to subdivision (p) of such section 56 22-623, and two hundred fifty employment shares. Any written documenta- S. 8063--A 12 1 tion submitted to the mayor or such agency or agencies in order to 2 obtain any such certification shall be deemed a written instrument for 3 purposes of section 175.00 of the penal law. Application fees for such 4 certifications shall be determined by the mayor or such agency or agen- 5 cies. No certification of eligibility shall be issued to an eligible 6 business on or after July first, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-eight 7 unless: 8 § 12. Title 22 of the administrative code of the city of New York is 9 amended by adding a new chapter 6-E to read as follows: 10 CHAPTER 6-E 11 RELOCATION ASSISTANCE CREDIT PER EMPLOYEE 12 Section 22-627 Definitions. 13 22-628 Authorization to provide relocation assistance credit per 14 employee. 15 § 22-627 Definitions. When used in this chapter, the following terms 16 shall have the following meanings: 17 (a) "Aggregate employment shares" means the sum of all employment 18 shares maintained by an eligible business in a taxable year. 19 (b) "Eligible aggregate employment shares" means, in the case of an 20 eligible business, the amount, if any, of aggregate employment shares 21 maintained by an eligible business in eligible premises in the taxable 22 year in which such eligible business claims a credit pursuant to section 23 22-628 of this chapter; provided, however, that: 24 (1) such amount shall not exceed the lesser of: 25 (i) the number of aggregate employment shares maintained by such 26 eligible business in eligible premises in the taxable year during which 27 such eligible business relocates; 28 (ii) the maximum approved employment shares for such eligible busi- 29 ness; or 30 (iii) an amount equal to the product of multiplying the aggregate 31 employment shares and the linear scalar for such eligible business in 32 such tax year; and 33 (2) a full-time work week or part-time work week at eligible premises 34 prior to the date of relocation shall not be taken into account in 35 determining eligible aggregate employment shares. 36 (c) "Eligible business" means any person subject to a tax imposed 37 under chapter five, subchapter two, three or three-A of chapter six of 38 title eleven of this code, that: 39 (1) has been conducting substantial business operations at one or more 40 business locations outside of New York state for the twenty-four consec- 41 utive months immediately preceding the taxable year during which such 42 eligible business relocates but has not maintained employment shares at 43 premises in New York state at any time during the period beginning Janu- 44 ary first, two thousand twenty-five and ending on the date such business 45 enters into a lease or a contract to purchase the premises that will 46 qualify as eligible premises pursuant to this chapter; and 47 (2) on or after July first, two thousand twenty-five relocates all or 48 part of such business operations. 49 (d) "Eligible premises" means one or more non-residential premises 50 that consist of at least ten thousand square feet that are: 51 (1) wholly contained in real property located in the city of New York; 52 and S. 8063--A 13 1 (2) if contained in real property wholly contained in the borough of 2 Manhattan, are premises for which final certificates of occupancy were 3 issued prior to January first, two thousand. 4 (e) "Employment share" means, for each employee, partner or sole 5 proprietor of an eligible business, the sum of: (1) the number of full- 6 time work weeks worked by such employee, partner or sole proprietor 7 during the eligible business's taxable year divided by the number of 8 weeks in the taxable year; and (2) the number of part-time work weeks 9 worked by such employee, partner or sole proprietor during the eligible 10 business's taxable year divided by an amount equal to twice the number 11 of weeks in the taxable year. Employment share shall not include full- 12 time or part-time work weeks attributable to employees, partners or sole 13 proprietors acquired by an eligible business as a result of a merger 14 with, acquisition of another person, or a transaction having a compara- 15 ble effect, that occurs after June thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five, 16 and before the end of the taxable year in which a credit is claimed by 17 such eligible business pursuant to this section, or to successors, if 18 any, to those employees, partners or sole proprietors. 19 (f) "Full-time work week" means a week during which at least thirty- 20 five hours of gainful work has been performed by an employee, partner or 21 sole proprietor. 22 (g) "Hotel services" means any services that consist predominately of 23 the lodging of guests at a building or a portion thereof that is regu- 24 larly used and kept open for such services. Hotel services shall include 25 the lodging of guests at an apartment hotel, a motel, boarding house or 26 club, whether or not meals are served. 27 (h) "Linear scalar" means, for an eligible business in a taxable year, 28 the quotient of dividing: 29 (1) the total square footage of an eligible premises; by 30 (2) the product of multiplying one hundred seventy-five by such busi- 31 ness's aggregate employment shares. 32 (i) "Maximum approved employment shares" means a limitation on the 33 aggregate employment shares that an eligible business may receive in any 34 taxable year determined by the mayor pursuant to section 22-628 of this 35 chapter based on documentation submitted by such business demonstrating 36 such business's intention to relocate. The maximum approved employment 37 shares is the number of aggregate employment shares such business 38 intends to relocate as indicated by the mayor on the applicable initial 39 certification of eligibility. 40 (j) "Mayor" means the mayor, or an agency as designated by the mayor. 41 (k) "Part-time work week" means a week during which at least fifteen 42 but less than thirty-five hours of gainful work has been performed by an 43 employee, partner or sole proprietor. 44 (l) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association, joint- 45 stock company, corporation, estate or trust, limited liability company, 46 and any combination of the foregoing. 47 (m) "Program total" means the sum of maximum approved aggregate 48 employment shares included in all initial certification of eligibility 49 issued by the mayor. 50 (n) "Relocate" means, with respect to an eligible business, to trans- 51 fer a pre-existing business operation to an eligible premises, or to 52 establish a new business operation at such premises, provided that an 53 eligible business shall not be deemed to have relocated unless at least 54 one employee, partner or sole proprietor of the eligible business is 55 transferred to such premises from a pre-existing business operation 56 conducted outside the state of New York. The date of relocation shall be S. 8063--A 14 1 the first day on which the individual so transferred commences work at 2 such eligible premises. The taxable year of relocation shall be the 3 taxable year in which the date of relocation occurs. For purposes of 4 this chapter, an eligible business may relocate only once but may add or 5 substitute other eligible premises throughout such period. 6 (o) "Retail activity" means any activity which consists predominately 7 of: 8 (1) the sale, other than through the mail or by the telephone or by 9 means of the internet, of tangible personal property to a person, for 10 any purpose unrelated to the trade or business of such person; 11 (2) the selling of a service to an individual which generally involves 12 the physical, mental or spiritual care of such individual; 13 (3) the physical care of the personal property of any person unrelated 14 to the trade or business of such person; or 15 (4) the provision of a retail banking service. 16 § 22-628 Authorization to provide relocation assistance credit per 17 employee. (a) An eligible business that relocates shall be allowed to 18 receive a credit against a tax imposed by chapter five, subchapter two, 19 three or three-A of chapter six of title eleven of this code, as 20 described in subdivision (r) of section 11-503, subdivision twenty-four 21 of section 11-604, section 11-643.10, or subdivision twenty-four of 22 section 11-654 of this code. 23 (b) No eligible business shall be authorized to receive a credit 24 against tax under the provisions of this chapter and of title eleven of 25 this code as described in subdivision (a) of this section, unless the 26 premises with respect to which it is claiming the credit are eligible 27 premises and until it has obtained an initial certification of eligibil- 28 ity from the mayor and an annual certification from the mayor as to the 29 number of eligible aggregate employment shares maintained by such eligi- 30 ble business that may qualify for obtaining a tax credit for the eligi- 31 ble business's taxable year. Each initial certification of eligibility 32 shall include the maximum approved employment shares for the eligible 33 business, which shall not exceed five hundred employment shares. Any 34 written documentation submitted to the mayor in order to obtain any such 35 certification shall be deemed a written instrument for purposes of 36 section 175.00 of the penal law. An application fee for such certif- 37 ication shall be determined by the mayor. No initial certification of 38 eligibility shall be issued to an eligible business on or after July 39 first, two thousand twenty-eight unless: 40 (1) prior to such date such business has purchased, leased or entered 41 into a contract to purchase or lease eligible premises; 42 (2) prior to such date such business submits a preliminary application 43 for an initial certification of eligibility to such mayor with respect 44 to a proposed relocation to such premises; 45 (3) such business enters into a lease or contract to purchase an 46 eligible premises between the date that such business submits such 47 preliminary application and three months thereafter; and 48 (4) such business relocates to such premises not later than thirty-six 49 months from the date of submission of such preliminary application. 50 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the mayor 51 shall not issue an initial certification of eligibility that would cause 52 the program total to exceed three thousand maximum approved employment 53 shares. The mayor shall approve such applications on a first-come, 54 first-serve basis among eligible businesses in accordance with rules 55 promulgated pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section. The mayor shall 56 include on the mayor's website an indication regarding whether the S. 8063--A 15 1 program total has reached three thousand maximum approved employment 2 shares. 3 (d) The mayor shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations 4 to administer and ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter, 5 including but not limited to rules and regulations to provide for alter- 6 native methods to measure employment shares in instances where an eligi- 7 ble business is not required by law to maintain weekly records of full- 8 time work weeks and part-time work weeks of employees, partners or sole 9 proprietors. 10 (e) For the duration of the benefit period, the recipient of a credit 11 shall file an application for an annual certification each year demon- 12 strating such recipient's eligibility for such credit and the average 13 wage and benefits offered to the applicable relocated employees used in 14 determining eligible aggregate employment shares. Such mayor shall have 15 the authority to require that statements filed under this subdivision be 16 filed electronically and that such statements be certified. 17 § 13. No later than April first of each year, the mayor of a city 18 which has adopted a local law authorized under article 2-H, article 2-J, 19 or article 2-K of the general city law, also known as the relocation and 20 employment assistance program, the lower Manhattan relocation and 21 employment assistance program, and the relocation assistance credit per 22 employee program shall submit a report to the governor, the temporary 23 president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly. Such report 24 shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information for 25 each assistance program for the most recent taxable year: 26 (a) the total number of eligible businesses or special eligible busi- 27 nesses that applied for a certificate of eligibility; 28 (b) the number of eligible businesses or special eligible businesses 29 that received a certificate of eligibility; 30 (c) the number of eligible businesses or special eligible businesses 31 that were denied a certificate of eligibility; 32 (d) the total number of credits received by all eligible businesses or 33 special eligible businesses and the aggregate employment shares for each 34 eligible business or special eligible business; 35 (e) the number of eligible businesses or special eligible businesses 36 that received a credit in each borough of a city that has adopted a 37 local law pursuant to article 2-H or article 2-J of the general city 38 law; 39 (f) the borough, municipality, or state each eligible business or 40 special eligible business that received a credit relocated from, and the 41 eligible area or eligible lower Manhattan area, as applicable, that the 42 eligible businesses or special eligible businesses relocated to and the 43 year in which such relocation occurred; and 44 (g) any such other information considered relevant by the mayor. 45 Such report shall be made publicly available on such city's website on 46 the same day the report is submitted. 47 § 14. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025; provided however, that 48 section thirteen of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed on and 49 after January 1, 2031.